Mississippi, session 2026, HB4135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The governing authorities of the City of Waynesboro, Mississippi, is authorized, in their discretion, by resolution duly adopted, to levy an assessment, in addition to any other assessments and court costs, on convictions obtained in the Waynesboro Municipal Court, as follows: (a)  An amount not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each misdemeanor conviction and/or non-adjudication obtained in the municipal court, except for convictions and/or non-adjudications for driving under the influence; and (b)  An amount not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) on each conviction for driving under the influence (D.U.I.) of alcohol and/or D.U.I. non-adjudication, which has impaired the person's ability to operate a motor vehicle, pursuant to Section 63-11-30, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  The avails of the additional assessment imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be expended by the governing authorities of Waynesboro, Mississippi, to fund repairs, construction, operation, furnishing, technology and maintenance of city building infrastructure within Waynesboro.  For the purposes of construction, repairs and upgrade, the funds derived under this section may also be used for matching purposes for any grants, if any. (3)  This section shall be repealed from and after July 1, 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.